Massachusetts, session 194th, H423.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 6B of chapter 149 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
The commissioner shall offer the application and examination for a license issued or
renewed pursuant to this section in English, Spanish and Portuguese, and may offer the
application and examination in any other language.
of 1